Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-6319.35
Residential dwelling, defined.

Residential dwelling means a detached single-family dwelling unit, including attached structures such as porches and stoops, or a single-family dwelling unit in a structure that contains more than one separate residential dwelling unit which is used or occupied or intended to be used or occupied, in whole or in part, as the home or residence of one or more persons.

Laws 1999, LB 863, § 37.